Alaska, session 34, HB329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 18.62.010 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 18.62.010. Certificate of fitness required. In connection with work 05 performed subject to the standards established in AS 18.60.580 and AS 18.60.705, a 06 person may not be employed without a certificate of fitness to perform the work, 07 except that a certificate of fitness may not be required of employees of an electric 08 utility, or qualified employees of the local municipal or tribal government 09 performing work on behalf of the utility, 10 (1) within a service area that does not contain [HAVE WITHIN ITS 11 SERVICE AREA] any portion of a city or unified municipality having more than 12 2,500 population; or 13 (2) within a portion of a service area that is not 14 (A) electrically interconnected with another portion of the 15 electric utility's service area; and 01 (B) a city or unified municipality having more than 2,500 02 population. 03 * Sec. 2. AS 18.62.010 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 04 (b) An electric utility shall ensure that an employee of a local municipal or 05 tribal government performing work on behalf of the electric utility is a qualified 06 employee and all work is performed in accordance with electrical safety standards 07 established in AS 18.60.580. 08 (c) In this section, "qualified employee" means a person who, through 09 possession of a recognized degree, certificate, professional standing, or knowledge, 10 training, and experience, has successfully demonstrated the ability to safely perform 11 the work assigned. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.